Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1378.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302(a)(7) of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended to read:Section 302. Forests.(a) Acquisition, establishment and disposition.--The department has the following powers and duties with respect to the acquisition, establishment and disposition of State forest lands and certain other Commonwealth-owned resources:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *(7) To appoint and, with the approval of the Governor, fix the compensation of a Chief Forest Fire Warden and such district forest fire wardens, and to appoint and fix the compensation of such local forest fire wardens and other assistants as shall be required for the prevention, control, and extinction of forest fires[.] and to appoint the Chief Forest Fire Warden to serve as a Deputy Secretary in the department.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1378PN1579 - 2 - 1234567891011